Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
In General

§§ 93-11-1 through 93-11-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 131, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§93-11-1. [Codes, 1942, § 456-33; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 33]

§93-11-3. [Codes, 1942, § 456-01; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 1]

§93-11-5. [Codes, 1942, § 456-02; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 1]

§93-11-7. [Codes, 1942, § 456-03; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 3]

§93-11-9. [Codes, 1942, § 456-04; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 2]

§93-11-11. [Codes, 1942, § 456-05; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 3]

§93-11-13. [Codes, 1942, § 456-06; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 4]

§93-11-15. [Codes, 1942, § 456-07; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 5]

§93-11-17. [Codes, 1942, § 456-08; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 6]

§93-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 456-09; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 9; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 7]

§93-11-21. [Codes, 1942, § 456-10; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 10; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 2]

§93-11-23. [Codes, 1942, § 456-11; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 11; Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 20; Laws, 1987, ch. 400; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 3]

§93-11-25. [Codes, 1942, § 456-12; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 12; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 4]

§93-11-27. [Codes, 1942, § 456-13; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 8]

§93-11-29. [Codes, 1942, § 456-14; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 14; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 6]

§93-11-31. [Codes, 1942, § 456-15; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 15; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 9]

§93-11-33. [Codes, 1942, § 456-16; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 16]

§93-11-35. [Codes, 1942, § 456-17; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 17; Laws, 1987, ch. 399; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 10]

§93-11-37. [Codes, 1942, § 456-18; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 18; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 11]

§93-11-39. [Codes, 1942, § 456-19; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 19]

§93-11-41. [Codes, 1942, § 456-20; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 20; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 12]

§93-11-43. [Codes, 1942, § 456-21; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 21]

§93-11-45. [Codes, 1942, § 456-22; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 22; Laws, 1987, ch. 455, § 6; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 10]

§93-11-47. [Codes, 1942, § 456-23; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 23; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 13]

§93-11-49. [Codes, 1942, § 456-24; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 24; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 12; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 14]

§93-11-51. [Codes, 1942, § 456-25; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 25]

§93-11-53. [Codes, 1942, § 456-26; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 26]

§93-11-55. [Codes, 1942, § 456-27; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 27]

§93-11-57. [Codes, 1942, § 458-28; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 28]

§93-11-59. [Codes, 1942, § 456-30; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 30; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 13]

§93-11-61. [Codes, 1942, § 456-31; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 31; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 14]

§93-11-63. [Codes, 1942, § 456-32; Laws, 1954, ch. 211, § 32; Laws, 1989, ch. 370, § 15]

§ 93-11-64.
Use of social security numbers for locating parents.

The Department of Human Services and its divisions, and any agency, office or registry established by the department, or which works in conjunction with the department, or is authorized to supply information to the department, may use Social Security numbers for the purpose of locating parents or alleged parents, establishing parentage, and establishing the amount of, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations.

This section requires that the Social Security number of:

Any applicant for a state-issued license be recorded on the application;

Any individual who is subject to a divorce decree, support order, or paternity determination or acknowledgment be placed in the records relating to the matter; and

Any individual who has died be placed in the records relating to the death and be recorded on the death certificate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 93-11-65.
Custody and support of minor children; additional remedies; determination of emancipation; temporary support awarded pending determination of parentage; effect of military duty on custody and visitation.

In addition to the right to proceed under Section 93-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, and in addition to the remedy of habeas corpus in proper cases, and other existing remedies, the chancery court of the proper county shall have jurisdiction to entertain suits for the custody, care, support and maintenance of minor children and to hear and determine all such matters, and shall, if need be, require bond, sureties or other guarantee to secure any order for periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child. In the event a legally responsible parent has health insurance available to him or her through an employer or organization that may extend benefits to the dependents of such parent, any order of support issued against such parent may require him or her to exercise the option of additional coverage in favor of such children as he or she is legally responsible to support. Proceedings may be brought by or against a resident or nonresident of the State of Mississippi, whether or not having the actual custody of minor children, for the purpose of judicially determining the legal custody of a child. All actions herein authorized may be brought in the county where the child is actually residing, or in the county of the residence of the party who has actual custody, or of the residence of the defendant. Process shall be had upon the parties as provided by law for process in person or by publication, if they be nonresidents of the state or residents of another jurisdiction or are not found therein after diligent search and inquiry or are unknown after diligent search and inquiry; provided that the court or chancellor in vacation may fix a date in termtime or in vacation to which process may be returnable and shall have power to proceed in termtime or vacation. Provided, however, that if the court shall find that both parties are fit and proper persons to have custody of the children, and that either party is able to adequately provide for the care and maintenance of the children, the chancellor may consider the preference of a child of twelve (12) years of age or older as to the parent with whom the child would prefer to live in determining what would be in the best interest and welfare of the child. The chancellor shall place on the record the reason or reasons for which the award of custody was made and explain in detail why the wishes of any child were or were not honored.

An order of child support shall specify the sum to be paid weekly or otherwise. In addition to providing for support and education, the order shall also provide for the support of the child prior to the making of the order for child support, and such other expenses as the court may deem proper.

The court may require the payment to be made to the custodial parent, or to some person or corporation to be designated by the court as trustee, but if the child or custodial parent is receiving public assistance, the Department of Human Services shall be made the trustee.

The noncustodial parent’s liabilities for past education and necessary support and maintenance and other expenses are limited to a period of one (1) year next preceding the commencement of an action.

Provided further, that where the proof shows that both parents have separate incomes or estates, the court may require that each parent contribute to the support and maintenance of the children in proportion to the relative financial ability of each.

Whenever the court has ordered a party to make periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child, but no bond, sureties or other guarantee has been required to secure such payments, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, the court may, upon petition of the person to whom such payments are owing, or such person’s legal representative, enter an order requiring that bond, sureties or other security be given by the person obligated to make such payments, the amount and sufficiency of which shall be approved by the court. The obligor shall, as in other civil actions, be served with process and shall be entitled to a hearing in such case.

When a charge of abuse or neglect of a child first arises in the course of a custody or maintenance action pending in the chancery court pursuant to this section, the chancery court may proceed with the investigation, hearing and determination of such abuse or neglect charge as a part of its hearing and determination of the custody or maintenance issue as between the parents, as provided in Section 43-21-151, notwithstanding the other provisions of the Youth Court Law. The proceedings in chancery court on the abuse or neglect charge shall be confidential in the same manner as provided in youth court proceedings, and the chancery court shall appoint a guardian ad litem in such cases, as provided under Section 43-21-121 for youth court proceedings, who shall be an attorney. In determining whether any portion of a guardian ad litem’s fee shall be assessed against any party or parties as a cost of court for reimbursement to the county, the court shall consider each party’s individual ability to pay. Unless the chancery court’s jurisdiction has been terminated, all disposition orders in such cases for placement with the Department of Human Services shall be reviewed by the court or designated authority at least annually to determine if continued placement with the department is in the best interest of the child or the public.

Each party to a paternity or child support proceeding shall notify the other within five (5) days after any change of address. In addition, the noncustodial and custodial parent shall file and update, with the court and with the state case registry, information on that party’s location and identity, including social security number, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, photograph, driver’s license number, and name, address and telephone number of the party’s employer. This information shall be required upon entry of an order or within five (5) days of a change of address.

In any case subsequently enforced by the Department of Human Services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction.

In any subsequent child support enforcement action between the parties, upon sufficient showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, due process requirements for notice and service of process shall be deemed to be met with respect to the party upon delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address filed with the state case registry.

The duty of support of a child terminates upon the emancipation of the child. Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, emancipation shall occur when the child:

Attains the age of twenty-one (21) years, or

Marries, or

Joins the military and serves on a full-time basis, or

Is convicted of a felony and is sentenced to incarceration of two (2) or more years for committing such felony; or

Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, the court may determine that emancipation has occurred and no other support obligation exists when the child:

Discontinues full-time enrollment in school having attained the age of eighteen (18) years, unless the child is disabled, or

Voluntarily moves from the home of the custodial parent or guardian, establishes independent living arrangements, obtains full-time employment and discontinues educational endeavors prior to attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years, or

Cohabits with another person without the approval of the parent obligated to pay support; and

The duty of support of a child who is incarcerated but not emancipated shall be suspended for the period of the child’s incarceration.

A determination of emancipation does not terminate any obligation of the noncustodial parent to satisfy arrearage existing as of the date of emancipation; the total amount of periodic support due prior to the emancipation plus any periodic amounts ordered paid toward the arrearage shall continue to be owed until satisfaction of the arrearage in full, in addition to the right of the person for whom the obligation is owed to execute for collection as may be provided by law.

Upon motion of a party requesting temporary child support pending a determination of parentage, temporary support shall be ordered if there is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of genetic tests or other evidence, unless the court makes written findings of fact on the record that the award of temporary support would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.

Custody and visitation upon military temporary duty, deployment or mobilization shall be governed by Section 93-5-34.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1263.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 268; Laws, 1984, ch. 367; Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 16; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 345, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 15; Laws, 2000, ch. 530, § 6; Laws, 2006, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 565, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 389, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 540, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 93-11-67.
Personal jurisdiction over nonresident defendants.

In an action for child support, a court may exercise personal jurisdiction over and enter a judgment in personam against a defendant if personal service of process is made as provided below and if the parties had resided in a marital relationship with each other in this state for thirty (30) days and if the complainant has continuously resided in this state after the defendant has become a nonresident.

The defendant shall be personally served with a summons and a copy of the petition in the manner prescribed by the law of the state or jurisdiction in which service is made or by any form of mail addressed to the defendant with a receipt showing personal delivery or by personal service outside this state or jurisdiction in the manner prescribed for service within this state.

Proof of service outside this state or jurisdiction may be by affidavit of the individual who made service or in the manner prescribed by the law of this state or in the manner prescribed by the law of the state or jurisdiction in which service is made. If service is by mail, proof may be a receipt signed by the defendant or other evidence of personal delivery to the defendant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 16, eff from and after July 2, 1993.

§ 93-11-69.
Provision of information to consumer reporting agency as to overdue support.

As used in this section:

“Noncustodial parent” means a parent from whom the Department of Human Services is collecting support payments, and shall have the same meaning as “absent parent.”

“Consumer reporting agency” means any person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties, and who uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Overdue support” means any payments that are ordered by any court to be paid by an absent parent for the support of a child that have remained unpaid for at least thirty (30) days after payment is due. Overdue support shall also include payments that are ordered by any court to be paid for maintenance of a spouse in cases in which the department is collecting such support in conjunction with child support.

The department shall make available to any consumer reporting agency a report of the amount of overdue support owed by an absent parent.

Before any information regarding an absent parent’s overdue support may be made available pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a copy of the report shall be mailed to the absent parent at such parent’s last known address and the absent parent shall be given the opportunity to contest the information contained in the report as follows:

The absent parent may, within fifteen (15) days after such notice is mailed, contest the accuracy of the information contained in the report by filing with the department a brief written statement concerning the nature of the alleged inaccuracies.

Upon receipt of such statement the department shall, within a reasonable amount of time, reexamine the information contained in the report.

If upon such reexamination the information in the report is found to be inaccurate, the department shall correct the information and send a copy of such corrected information to the absent parent.

If upon such reexamination the information contained in the report is found to be accurate, the department shall notify the absent parent of this fact.

Within ten (10) days after a copy of the reexamined information contained in the report is mailed to the absent parent, such absent parent may again contest the accuracy of such information by filing a brief written statement concerning the alleged inaccuracies and the department shall clearly note in any report to the consumer reporting agency the fact that the information is disputed unless there are reasonable grounds to believe that the statement filed by the absent parent is frivolous or irrelevant.

The fee charged by the department for furnishing a report pursuant to this section shall not exceed the actual cost of furnishing such report.

The Child Support Unit of the department may provide overdue support information to consumer reporting agencies through an automated computer system free of charge and with notice to the defendant as required by Title IV-D of the Social Security Act and the implementing regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 12; Laws, 1993, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 140, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 93-11-71.
Judgment for overdue child support; forgiveness of arrears under certain circumstances; credit toward arrearage under certain circumstances.

Whenever a court orders any person to make periodic payments of a sum certain for the maintenance or support of a child, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, a judgment by operation of law shall arise against the obligor in an amount equal to all payments that are then due and owing.

A judgment arising under this section shall have the same effect and be fully enforceable as any other judgment entered in this state. A judicial or administrative action to enforce the judgment may be begun at any time; and

Such judgments arising in other states by operation of law shall be given full faith and credit in this state.

Any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall operate as a lien upon all the property of the judgment debtor, both real and personal, which lien shall be perfected as to third parties without actual notice thereof only upon enrollment on the judgment roll. The department or attorney representing the party to whom support is owed shall furnish an abstract of the judgment for periodic payments for the maintenance and support of a child, along with sworn documentation of the delinquent child support, to the circuit clerk of the county where the judgment is rendered, and it shall be the duty of the circuit clerk to enroll the judgment on the judgment roll. Liens arising under the provisions of this section may be executed upon and enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as any other judgment.

Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (2) of this section, any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall subject the following assets to interception or seizure without regard to the entry of the judgment on the judgment roll of the situs district or jurisdiction and such assets shall apply to all child support owed including all arrears:

Periodic or lump-sum payments from a federal, state or local agency, including unemployment compensation, workers’ compensation and other benefits;

Winnings from lotteries and gaming winnings that are received in periodic payments made over a period in excess of thirty (30) days;

Assets held in financial institutions;

Settlements and awards resulting from civil actions;

Public and private retirement funds, only to the extent that the obligor is qualified to receive and receives a lump-sum or periodic distribution from the funds; and

Lump-sum payments as defined in Section 93-11-101.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, upon disestablishment of paternity granted pursuant to Section 93-9-10 and a finding of clear and convincing evidence including negative DNA testing that the obligor is not the biological father of the child or children for whom support has been ordered, the court shall disestablish paternity and may forgive any child support arrears of the obligor for the child or children determined by the court not to be the biological child or children of the obligor, if the court makes a written finding that, based on the totality of the circumstances, the forgiveness of the arrears is equitable under the circumstances.

In any case in which a child receives assistance from block grants for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), and the obligor owes past-due child support, the obligor, if not incapacitated, may be required by the court to participate in any work programs offered by any state agency.

A parent who receives social security disability insurance payments who is liable for a child support arrearage and whose disability insurance benefits provide for the payment of past due disability insurance benefits for the support of the minor child or children for whom the parent owes a child support arrearage shall receive credit toward the arrearage for the payment or payments for the benefit of the minor child or children if the arrearage accrued after the date of disability onset as determined by the Social Security Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 134; Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 16; Laws, 2007, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 6; Laws, 2010, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 530, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 93-11-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Laws, 1993, ch. 506, § 18, eff from and after July 2, 1993.]